Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-613
Pupils; transportation allowance; temporary residence; attendance at another school; how computed.

(1) When a student or students whose family would otherwise be eligible for the transportation allowance provided in section 79-611 reside temporarily for school purposes within four miles of the schoolhouse, the family of such student or students shall be paid two hundred eighty-five percent of the mileage rate provided in section 81-1176 for each mile actually and necessarily traveled by which the distance traveled one way from the residence of such family to the temporary residence exceeds three miles.

(2) When (a) a student or students whose family would otherwise be eligible for the transportation allowance provided in section 79-611 attend school in an adjacent school district due to convenience of the family and (b) the school district of residence pays tuition on behalf of such student or students pursuant to section 79-598, there shall also be paid by such school district of residence a transportation allowance equal to two hundred eighty-five percent of the mileage rate provided in section 81-1176 for each mile actually and necessarily traveled on each day of attendance by which the distance traveled one way from the residence of such student or students to the schoolhouse in the adjacent school district exceeds three miles.

Laws 1929, c. 92, § 1, p. 348;

C.S.1929, § 79-1902;

Laws 1931, c. 149, § 1, p. 405;

Laws 1941, c. 163, § 1, p. 650;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 79-1902;

R.S.1943, § 79-1909;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 130, p. 736;

Laws 1963, c. 483, § 2, p. 1554;

Laws 1986, LB 419, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-492;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 374.